Maryland, session 2025, HB0736.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–303.
(k) (1) (I) A county is eligible for an adjustment to the local cost–share for
school construction projects under [paragraph (2)] SUBPARAGRAPH (II) of this
[subsection] PARAGRAPH if:
[(i)] 1. A county’s median household income is in the bottom
quartile in the State; and
[(ii)] 2. The State and local cost–share formula for the county is
50% State and 50% local.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0736*

HOUSE BILL 736
[(2) (i)] (II) 1. The local cost–share of a school construction project
in a county that is eligible under [paragraph (1)] SUBPARAGRAPH (I) of this [subsection]
PARAGRAPH shall be reduced to equal the local cost–share of the adjacent county that is
less than 50% but closest to 50%.
[(ii)] 2. The State cost–share of a school construction project in the
eligible county shall be increased by a percentage that is equal to the reduction under
[subparagraph (i) of this paragraph] SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.
(2) (I) A COUNTY IS ELIGIBLE FOR AN ADJUSTMENT TO THE LOCAL
COST–SHARE FOR AN ELIGIBLE SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION PROJECT IN THE COUNTY
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IF:
1. THE PERCENTAGE OF STUDENTS IN THE COUNTY
ELIGIBLE FOR FREE OR REDUCED PRICE MEALS IS GREATER THAN THE STATEWIDE
AVERAGE OF STUDENTS ELIGIBLE FOR FREE OR REDUCED PRICE MEALS;
2. ALL SCHOOLS IN THE COUNTY PARTICIPATE IN THE
U.S. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE COMMUNITY ELIGIBILITY PROVISION;
3. THE STATE AND LOCAL COST–SHARE FORMULA FOR
THE COUNTY IS 50% STATE AND 50% LOCAL; AND
4. THE ELIGIBLE PROJECT IS A SCHOOL THAT IS ONLY
AN ELEMENTARY, MIDDLE, OR HIGH SCHOOL.
(II) 1. THE LOCAL COST–SHARE OF A SCHOOL
CONSTRUCTION PROJECT IN A COUNTY THAT IS ELIGIBLE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH
(I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE REDUCED TO EQUAL THE AVERAGE OF COUNTIES
IN WHICH ALL SCHOOLS IN THE COUNTY PARTICIPATE IN THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
AGRICULTURE COMMUNITY ELIGIBILITY PROVISION.
2. THE STATE COST–SHARE OF A SCHOOL
CONSTRUCTION PROJECT IN THE ELIGIBLE COUNTY SHALL BE INCREASED BY A
PERCENTAGE THAT IS EQUAL TO THE REDUCTION UNDER SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.
(3) A county shall receive:
(i) A 10 percentage point increase in the State share of a school
construction project if the proposed school construction project, when a local school system
submits a project for approval to the Interagency Commission, is at a school with a
concentration of poverty level, as defined in § 5–223 of this title, of 80% or greater;

HOUSE BILL 736 3
(ii) A 5 percentage point increase in the State share of a school
construction project if the proposed school construction project, when a local school system
submits a project for approval to the Interagency Commission, is at a school with a
concentration of poverty level, as defined in § 5–223 of this title, of less than 80% but greater
than 55%;
(iii) A 5 percentage point increase in the State share of a school
construction project if the proposed school construction project is at a school that, in the
most recent school maintenance effectiveness assessment by the Interagency Commission,
received an assessment rating of:
1. Good;
2. Superior; or
3. Adequate and the school’s current school facility
assessment percent of expected useful life is at least 120%; and
(iv) A 5 percentage point increase in the State share of a school
construction project if the proposed project is to build a net–zero school.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.